California statutes. Vehicle Code
(b) (1) All applications for a driver’s license or identification card shall contain a space for an applicant to indicate whether they have served in the Armed Forces of the United States and to give their consent to be contacted regarding eligibility to receive state or federal veterans benefits. The application shall contain the following
 statement:
“By marking the veteran box on this application, I certify that I am a veteran of the United States Armed Forces and that I want to receive veterans benefits information from the California Department of Veterans Affairs. By marking the veteran box on this application, I also consent to DMV transmitting my name and mailing address to the California Department of Veterans Affairs for this purpose only, and I certify that I have been notified that this transmittal will occur.”
(2) The department shall collect the information obtained pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) As mutually agreed between the department and the Department of Veterans Affairs, the department shall electronically transmit to the Department of Veterans Affairs the following
 information on each applicant who has identified that they have served in the Armed Forces of the United States since the last data transfer and has consented to be contacted about veterans benefits:

(A) The applicant’s true full name.

(B) The applicant’s mailing address.

(4) Information obtained by the Department of Veterans Affairs for the purposes of this subdivision shall be used for the purpose of assisting individuals to access veterans benefits and shall not be disseminated except as needed for this purpose.

(5) An application for a driver’s license or identification card shall allow an applicant to request the word “VETERAN” be printed on the face of the driver’s license or identification card. A verification form shall be developed by the
 Department of Veterans Affairs in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles and the California Association of County Veterans Service Officers to acknowledge verification of veteran status. A county veterans service office shall verify the veteran’s status as a veteran, sign the verification form, and return it to the veteran. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall accept the signed verification form as proof of veteran status. The word “VETERAN” shall be printed on the face of a driver’s license or identification card, in a location determined by the department, and issued to a person who makes this request and presents the verification form to the department.

(c) A contract shall not be awarded to a nongovernmental entity for the processing of driver’s licenses unless the contract conforms to all applicable state contracting laws and all applicable procedures set forth in the State Contracting
 Manual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 216.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12811.1.

(a) Upon the applicant’s request, the department shall issue an adhesive backed medical information card which contains a format permitting the licensee to specify blood type, allergies, past or present medical problems, any medication being taken, the name of the licensee’s doctor, the person to notify in case of an emergency, and whether the licensee is under a doctor’s care.

(b) The medical information card, which shall be a different color than the anatomical gift Donor Dot authorized by Section 12811.3, shall be the same size as a driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 211, Sec. 4.   (AB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12811.3.

(a) A written or electronic application for an original or renewal driver’s license or identification card shall contain a space for the applicant to enroll in the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry. The application shall include check boxes for an applicant to mark either (A) Yes, add my name to the donor registry or (B) I do not wish to register at this time.

(b) (1) The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry to mutually agree upon the language accompanying the question of enrollment required in subdivision (a) for the purpose of defining enrollment and providing the corresponding disclosures.

(2) The
 department shall continue to use existing language accompanying the question of enrollment until a memorandum of understanding, as described in paragraph (1), is in effect.

(3) At any time a memorandum of understanding, as described in paragraph (1), is not in effect, the department shall continue to use
 the language from the most recent memorandum of understanding until a new one is in effect.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a person under 18 years of age may register as a donor. However, the legal guardian of that person shall make the final decision regarding the donation.

(d) The department shall collect donor designation information on all applications for an original or renewal driver’s license or identification card.

(e) The department shall print the word “DONOR” or another appropriate
 designation on the face of a driver’s license or identification card to a person who has indicated on the application their intent to enroll in the organ donation program pursuant to this section.

(f) On a weekly basis, the department shall electronically transmit to Donate Life California, a nonprofit organization established and designated as the California Organ and Tissue Donor Registrar pursuant to Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety Code, all of the following information from every application that indicates the applicant’s decision to enroll in the organ donation program:

(1) The applicant’s true full name.

(2) The applicant’s residence or mailing address.

(3) The applicant’s year of birth.

(4) The applicant’s California driver’s license number or identification card number.

(g) (1) A person who applies for an original or renewal driver’s license or identification card may designate a voluntary contribution of two dollars ($2) or more for the purpose of promoting and supporting organ and tissue donation. This contribution shall be collected by the department, and treated as a voluntary contribution to Donate Life California and not as a fee for the issuance of a driver’s license or identification card.

(2) The department may use the donations
 collected pursuant to this section to cover its actual administrative costs incurred pursuant to subdivisions (d) to (f), inclusive. The department shall deposit all revenue derived pursuant to this section and remaining after the department’s deduction for administrative costs in the Donate Life California Trust Subaccount that is hereby created in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all revenue in this subaccount is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Controller for allocation to Donate Life California and shall be expended for the purpose of increasing participation in organ donation programs.

(h) The enrollment form shall be posted on the internet websites for the department and the California Health and Human Services Agency.

(i) The enrollment form shall constitute a legal document pursuant to the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code) and shall remain binding after the donor’s death despite any express desires of next of kin opposed to the donation. Except for the provisions relating to a person under 18 years of age, the donation does not require the consent of any other person.

(j) Donate Life California shall ensure that all additions and deletions to the California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry, established pursuant to Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety Code, shall occur within 30 days of receipt.

(k) Information obtained by Donate Life
 California for the purposes of this section shall be used for these purposes only and shall not be disseminated further by Donate Life California.

(l) A public entity or employee shall not be liable for loss, detriment, or injury resulting directly or indirectly from false or inaccurate information contained in the enrollment form provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 211, Sec. 5.   (AB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12811.4.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Charlie’s Law.

(b) An electronic application for an original or renewal driver’s license or identification card shall contain a solicitation for the applicant to enroll in the registry operated by the National Marrow Donor Program. The application shall include a question regarding enrollment pursuant to subdivision (c) and check boxes for an applicant to mark either of the following:

(1) Yes, I would like to enroll in the registry to be a potential bone marrow or blood stem cell donor. I consent to my information being shared with the National Marrow Donor Program for the purposes of enrollment. I understand that I am not enrolled at this
 time and must complete the National Marrow Donor Program enrollment forms and cheek swab to be a registered bone marrow donor. I am aware that after enrollment, if matched, I have the ability to refuse to donate at any point.

(2) No, I do not wish to enroll at this time.

(c) An applicant’s election to enroll in the National Marrow Donor Program’s registry shall constitute consent to their information being transmitted to the National Marrow Donor Program for the purposes of completing enrollment in the registry. After submitting their electronic application for an original or renewal driver’s license or identification card, the applicant shall receive a followup communication to complete the National Marrow Donor Program application.

(d) The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the National
 Marrow Donor Program to mutually agree upon all
 of the following:

(1) The language of the question of enrollment required by subdivision (b). The language may define enrollment and donor requirements, including, but not limited to, limits on the transferring of data to only those eligible for enrollment in the National Marrow Donor Program, and may provide the corresponding disclosures.

(2) The language of the followup communication described in subdivision (c).

(3) The operative date for the provisions specified in subdivisions (b) and (e).

(e) On a weekly basis, the department shall electronically transmit to the National Marrow Donor Program all of the following information
 from every application that indicates the applicant’s intent to enroll as a potential bone marrow or blood stem cell donor:

(1) The applicant’s true full name.

(2) The applicant’s residence or mailing address.

(3) The applicant’s date of birth.

(4) The applicant’s telephone number.

(5) The applicant’s email address.

(f) The department and the California Health and Human Services Agency shall post the enrollment form on its internet website.

(g) Enrollment in the National Marrow Donor Program registry through the department does not constitute a legal document
 pursuant to the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code) and does not require registrants to donate if they are matched.

(h) Information obtained by the National Marrow Donor Program shall be used only for registry operations consistent with the informed consent of the applicant. Information obtained by the National Marrow Donor Program for the purposes of this section shall not be disseminated further by the National Marrow Donor Program.

(i) A public entity or its employee shall not be liable for loss, detriment, or injury resulting directly or indirectly from false or inaccurate information contained in the enrollment form provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 16, Sec. 5.   (SB 128)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12812.

If a driver with a class C or M license, who is not required to have a certificate under any provision of this code, is presumed to be a negligent operator pursuant to Section 12810.5, the department may, as a condition of probation, issue a restricted driver’s license to permit driving of a vehicle while in the course of the driver’s employment during specified hours of employment or any other restrictions as determined by the department. The restrictions shall be noted on the driver’s
 license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 272, Sec. 31.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12813.

(a) The department may, upon issuing a driver’s license or after issuance whenever good cause appears, impose restrictions suitable to the licensee’s driving ability with respect to the type of, or special mechanical control devices required on, a motor vehicle which the licensee may operate or impose other restrictions applicable to the licensee that the department may determine to be appropriate to
 assure the safe operation of a motor vehicle by the licensee.

(b) The department may issue either a special restricted license or may set forth the restrictions upon the usual license form.

(c) The authority of the department to issue restricted licenses under this section is subject to Sections 12812, 13352, 13353.3, and 13352.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   (AB 520)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12814.

(a) Application for renewal of a license shall be made at an office of the department by the person to whom the license was issued. The department may, in its discretion, require an examination of the applicant as upon an original application, an examination deemed by the department to be appropriate considering the licensee’s record of convictions and accidents, or an examination deemed by the department to be appropriate in relation to evidence of a condition that may affect the ability of the applicant to safely operate a motor vehicle. The age of a licensee, by itself, may not constitute evidence of a condition requiring an examination of the driving ability. If the department finds any evidence, the department shall disclose the evidence to the applicant or licensee. If the person is absent from the state at the time the license expires, the director may extend the license for a period of one year from the expiration date of the license.

(b) Renewal of a driver’s license shall be under terms and conditions prescribed by the department.

(c) The department may
 adopt and administer those regulations as shall be deemed necessary for the public safety in the implementation of a program of selective testing of applicants, and, with reference to this section, the department may waive tests for purposes of evaluation of selective testing procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 17.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12814.4.

(a) The director may establish a program to evaluate the traffic safety and other effects of renewing driver’s licenses by virtual or other remote processes, in lieu of submitting an application at an office of the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12814. Pursuant to that program, the department may renew driver’s licenses by virtual or other remote processes.

(b) The director may terminate the renewal by virtual or other remote processes authorized by this section at any time.

(c) On or before January 1, 2034, the department shall provide a report to the Legislature and relevant policy committees
 detailing the program established under this section.

(1) The report shall include the steps the department took to prevent individuals other than the applicant from taking the knowledge test, the number of individuals on an annual basis that opted to take the knowledge examination virtually or by other remote processes, and the number of individuals that opted to submit a test of their eyesight by virtual or other remote processes, and the process the department took to verify the authenticity of the tests submitted to the department.

(2) The report shall be submitted in compliance
 with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) A renewal by virtual or other remote processes under this program shall not be granted to a person who is 70 years of age or older without a test of the eyesight of the applicant.

(e) The
 department shall not renew a driver’s license by virtual or other remote processes that has been previously renewed by mail or by virtual or other remote processes two consecutive times for five-year periods, or by an applicant that is 80 years of age or older. 

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.   (AB 1606)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12814.5.

(a) The director may establish a program to evaluate the traffic safety and other effects of renewing driver’s licenses by mail. Pursuant to that program, the department may renew by mail driver’s licenses for licensees not holding a probationary license, and whose records, for the two years immediately preceding the determination of eligibility for the renewal, show no notification of a violation of subdivision (a) of former Section 40509, a total violation point count not greater than one as determined in accordance with Section 12810, no suspension of the driving privilege pursuant to Section 13353.2, and no refusal to submit to or complete
 chemical testing pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.1.

(b) The director may terminate the renewal by mail program authorized by this section at any time the department determines that the program has an adverse impact on traffic safety.

(c) A renewal by mail shall not be granted to any person who is 70 years of age or older.

(d) The department shall notify each licensee granted a renewal by mail pursuant to this section of major changes to the Vehicle Code affecting traffic laws occurring during the prior five-year period.

(e) The department shall not renew a driver’s license by mail if the license has been previously renewed by mail two consecutive times
 for five-year periods.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 254, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 12.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12814.6.

(a) Except as provided in Section 12814.7, a driver’s license issued to a person at least 16 years of age but under 18 years of age shall be issued pursuant to the provisional licensing program contained in this section. The program shall consist of all of the following components:

(1) Upon application for an original license, the applicant shall be issued an instruction permit pursuant to Section 12509. A person who has in their immediate possession a valid permit issued pursuant to Section 12509 may operate a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or motorized bicycle, only when the person is either taking the driver training instruction referred to
 in paragraph (3) or practicing that instruction, provided the person is accompanied by, and is under the immediate supervision of, a California-licensed driver 25 years of age or older whose driving privilege is not on probation. The age requirement of this paragraph does not apply if the licensed driver is the parent, spouse, or guardian of the permitholder or is a licensed or certified driving instructor.

(2) The person shall hold an instruction permit for not less than six months prior to applying for a provisional driver’s license.

(3) The person shall have complied with one of the following:

(A) Satisfactory completion of approved courses in automobile driver education and driver training maintained pursuant to provisions of the Education Code in any secondary school of California, or equivalent instruction in a secondary school of another state.

(B) Satisfactory completion of an integrated driver education and training program that is approved by the department and conducted by a driving instructor licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5. The program shall utilize segmented modules, whereby a portion of the educational instruction is provided by, and then reinforced through, specific behind-the-wheel training before moving to the next phase of driver education and training. The program shall contain a minimum of 30 hours of
 classroom instruction and 6 hours of behind-the-wheel training.

(C) Satisfactory completion of six hours or more of behind-the-wheel instruction by a driving school or an independent driving instructor licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5 and either an accredited course in automobile driver education in any secondary school of California pursuant to provisions of the Education Code or satisfactory completion of equivalent professional instruction acceptable to the department. To be acceptable to the department, the professional instruction shall meet minimum standards to be prescribed by the department, and the standards shall be at
 least equal to the requirements for driver education and driver training contained in the rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to the Education Code. A person who has complied with this subdivision shall not be required by the governing board of a school district to comply with subparagraph (A) in order to graduate from high school.

(D) Except as provided under subparagraph (B), a student may not take driver training instruction, unless the student has successfully completed driver education.

(4) The person shall complete 50 hours of supervised driving practice prior to the issuance of a provisional license, which is in addition to any other driver training instruction required by law. Not less than 10 of the required practice hours shall include
 driving during darkness, as defined in Section 280. Upon application for a provisional license, the person shall submit to the department the certification of a parent, spouse, guardian, or licensed or certified driving instructor that the applicant has completed the required amount of driving practice and is prepared to take the department’s driving test. A person without a parent, spouse, guardian, or who is an emancipated minor, may have a licensed driver 25 years of age or older or a licensed or certified driving instructor complete the certification. This requirement does not apply to motorcycle practice.

(5) The person shall successfully complete an examination required by the department. Before retaking a test, the person shall wait for not less than one week after failure of the written test and for not less than two weeks
 after failure of the driving test.

(b) Except as provided in Section 12814.7, the provisional driver’s license shall be subject to all of the following restrictions:

(1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), during the first 12 months after issuance of a provisional license the licensee may not do any of the following unless accompanied and supervised by a licensed driver who is the licensee’s parent or guardian, a licensed driver who is 25 years of age or older, or a licensed or certified driving instructor:

(A) Drive between the hours of 11 p.m. and 5 a.m.

(B) Transport passengers who are under 20 years of age.

(2) A licensee may drive between the hours of 11 p.m. and 5 a.m. or transport an immediate family member without being accompanied and supervised by a licensed driver who is the licensee’s parent or guardian, a licensed driver who is 25 years of age or older, or a licensed or certified driving instructor, in the following circumstances:

(A) Medical necessity of the licensee when reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from a physician familiar with the condition, containing a diagnosis and probable date when sufficient recovery will have been made to terminate the necessity.

(B) Schooling or school-authorized activities of the licensee when
 reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from the school principal, dean, or school staff member designated by the principal or dean, containing a probable date that the schooling or school-authorized activity will have been completed.

(C) Employment necessity of the licensee when reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from the employer, verifying employment and containing a probable date that the employment will have been completed.

(D) Necessity of the licensee or the licensee’s immediate family member when reasonable
 transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary to transport the licensee or the licensee’s immediate family member. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from a parent or legal guardian verifying the reason and containing a probable date that the necessity will have ceased.

(E) The licensee is an emancipated minor.

(c) A law enforcement officer shall not stop a vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether the driver is in violation of the restrictions imposed under subdivision (b).

(d) A law enforcement officer shall not stop a vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether a driver who is subject to the license restrictions in subdivision
 (b) is in violation of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 118947) of Chapter 4 of Part 15 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) (1) Upon a finding that any licensee has violated paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the court shall impose one of the following:

(A) Not less than 8 hours nor more than 16 hours of community service for a first offense and not less than 16 hours nor more than 24 hours of community service for a second or subsequent offense.

(B) A fine of not more than thirty-five dollars ($35) for a first offense and a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for a second or subsequent offense.

(2) If the court
 orders community service, the court shall retain jurisdiction until the hours of community service have been completed.

(3) If the hours of community service have not been completed within 90 days, the court shall impose a fine of not more than thirty-five dollars ($35) for a first offense and not more than fifty dollars ($50) for a second or subsequent offense.

(f) A conviction of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), when reported to the department, may not be disclosed as otherwise specified in Section 1808 or constitute a violation point count value pursuant to Section 12810.

(g) Any term of restriction or suspension of the driving privilege imposed on a person pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in effect
 until the end of the term even though the person becomes 18 years of age before the term ends.

(1) The driving privilege shall be suspended when the record of the person shows one or more notifications issued pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5. The suspension shall continue until any notification issued pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5 has been cleared.

(2) A 30-day restriction shall be imposed when a driver’s record shows a violation point count of two or more points in 12 months, as determined in accordance with Section 12810. The restriction shall require the licensee to be accompanied by a licensed parent, spouse, guardian, or other licensed driver 25 years of age or older, except when operating a class M vehicle, or so licensed, with no passengers aboard.

(3) A 6-month suspension of the driving privilege and a one-year term of probation shall be imposed whenever a licensee’s record shows a violation point count of three or more points in 12 months, as determined in accordance with Section 12810. The terms
 and conditions of probation shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(A) The person shall violate no law that, if resulting in
 conviction, is reportable to the department under Section 1803.

(B) The person shall remain free from accident responsibility.

(h) Whenever action by the department under subdivision (g) arises as a result of a motor vehicle accident, the person may, in writing and within 10 days, demand a hearing to present evidence that they were not responsible for the accident upon which the action is based. Whenever action by the department is based upon a conviction reportable to the department under Section 1803, the person has no right to a hearing pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14100) of Chapter 3.

(i) The department shall require a person whose driving privilege is suspended or revoked pursuant to
 subdivision (g) to submit proof of financial responsibility as defined in Section 16430. The proof of financial responsibility shall be filed on or before the date of reinstatement following the suspension or revocation. The proof of financial responsibility shall be maintained with the department for three years following the date of reinstatement.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the department may issue a distinctive driver’s license, that displays a distinctive color or a distinctively colored stripe or other distinguishing characteristic, to persons at least 16 years of age and older but under 18 years of age, and to persons 18 years of age and older but under 21 years of age, so that the distinctive license feature is immediately recognizable. The features shall clearly differentiate
 between driver’s licenses issued to persons at least 16 years of age or older but under 18 years of age and to persons 18 years of age or older but under 21 years of age.

(2) If changes in the format or appearance of driver’s licenses are adopted pursuant to this subdivision, those changes may be implemented under any new contract for the production of driver’s licenses entered into after the adoption of those changes.

(k) The department shall include, on the face of the provisional driver’s license, the original issuance date of the provisional driver’s license in addition to any other issuance date.

(l) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Brady-Jared Teen Driver Safety Act of 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 13.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12814.7.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisional licensing requirements of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 12814.6, the department shall issue to a person who is at least 16 years of age, but under 18 years of age, a restricted class C driver’s license valid for the operation of United States Army and California National Guard vehicles during the course and scope of their duties with the California National Guard if the following conditions are met:

(1) Upon application, the person provides the department with the executed enlistment contract for the applicant.

(2) The person qualifies for and is issued an instruction permit pursuant to Section 12509.

(3) Prior to the issuance of the class C license, the applicant provides proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driver education and training course administered by the California National Guard.

(b) A driver’s license issued pursuant to this section shall be subject to both of the following:

(1) Subdivisions (f) to (k), inclusive, of Section 12814.6.

(2) Pull-notice and periodic reports issued
 pursuant to Section 1808.1.

(c) The licensee shall comply with all other licensing requirements of this code, including, but not limited to, the requirements of Section 12804.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 418, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.

(a) If a driver’s license issued under this code is lost, destroyed or mutilated, or a new true, full name is acquired, the person to whom it was issued shall obtain a duplicate upon furnishing to the department (1) satisfactory proof of that loss, destruction, or mutilation and (2) if the licensee is a minor, evidence of permission to obtain a duplicate secured from the parents, guardian, or person having custody of the minor. Any person who loses a driver’s license and who, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original license shall immediately destroy the original license.

(b) A person in possession of a valid driver’s license who has been informed either by the department or by
 a law enforcement agency that the document is mutilated shall surrender the license
 to the department not later than 10 days after that notification.

(c) A person who submits a change of address pursuant to Section 14600 may apply to the department for a duplicate driver’s license. If a person receives a duplicate pursuant to this subdivision, they shall immediately destroy the license with the prior mailing address.

(d) For purposes of this section, a mutilated license is one that has been damaged sufficiently to render any or all of the elements of identity set forth in Sections 12800.5 and 12811 unreadable or unidentifiable through visual, mechanical, or electronic means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 417, Sec. 4.   (SB 506)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12816.

(a) Every original driver’s license expires on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application for the license.

(b) Renewal of a driver’s license shall be made for a term which expires on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the expiration of the license renewed, if application for renewal is made within six months prior to the expiration of the license to be renewed, or within 90
 days after expiration of the license. If renewal is not applied for within 90 days after expiration of the license, the application and fee is considered the same as an application for an original license.

(c) The department may accept application for a renewal of a driver’s license made more than six months prior to the date of expiration. The renewal shall be made for a term which expires on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application for the renewal license.

(d) The department may accept an application for a license of a different class made more than six months before the expiration of the license previously issued, if the previously issued license is surrendered for cancellation in accordance with Section 13100. The driver’s license issued from that application expires on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the
 application.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), the department may adjust the expiration date for any driver’s license issued pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1043, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12817.

(a) A California driver’s license held by a person who enters or is in the United States Armed Forces shall continue in full force and effect, so long as the service continues and the person remains absent from this state, and for a period not to exceed 30 days following the date the holder of the license is honorably separated from that service or returns to this state, whichever is earlier, unless the license was suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The license is valid only if it is in the immediate possession of the licensee and the licensee has in their immediate possession discharge or separation papers if the licensee has been discharged or separated from that service.

(b) A California driver’s license held by a spouse of a person described in subdivision (a) shall continue in full force and effect, so long as the person described in subdivision (a) continues in the service and remains absent from this state and the spouse remains absent from this state, and for a period not to exceed 30 days following the date the person described in subdivision (a) is honorably separated from that service or the date that the person or the spouse returns to this state, whichever is earlier, unless the spouse’s license was suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The license is valid only if it is in the immediate possession of the licensee and the licensee has in their immediate possession discharge or separation papers of the person described in subdivision (a).

(c) A California driver’s
 license held by a person who enters or is in the United States Foreign Service shall continue in full force and effect, so long as the service continues and the person remains absent from this state, and for a period not to exceed 30 days following the date the holder of the license returns to this state, unless the license was suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The license is valid only if it is in the immediate possession of the licensee and the licensee has in their immediate possession verification of active service papers.

(d) A California driver’s license held by a spouse of a person described in subdivision (c) shall continue in full force and effect, so long as the person described in subdivision (c) continues in the service and remains absent from this state and the spouse remains absent from this state,
 and for a period not to exceed 30 days following the date the person described in subdivision (c) or the spouse returns to this state, unless the spouse’s license was suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The license is valid only if it is in the immediate possession of the licensee and the licensee has in their immediate possession verification of active service papers of the person described in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.   (SB 267)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12818.

(a) Upon receipt of a request for reexamination and presentation of a legible copy of a notice of reexamination by a person issued the notice pursuant to Section 21061, the department shall reexamine the person’s qualifications to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to Section 13801, notwithstanding the notice requirement of Section 13801.

(b) Based on the department’s reexamination of the
 person’s qualifications pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall determine if either of the following actions should be taken:

(1) Suspend or revoke the driving privilege of that person if the department finds that any of the grounds exist which authorize the refusal to issue a license.

(2) Restrict, make subject to terms and conditions of probation, suspend, or revoke the driving privilege of that person based upon the records of the department as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13800).

(c) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the department may suspend or revoke the person’s driving privilege as provided under Article 2 (commencing with Section 13950) of Chapter 3.

(d) Upon request, the department shall notify the law
 enforcement agency which employs the traffic officer who issued the notice of reexamination of the results of the reexamination.
